Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-621
Board of directors; rules and regulations.

The board of directors may adopt rules and regulations, or bylaws not inconsistent with the provisions of Chapter 70, article 6, for the conduct of the business and affairs of the district.

Laws 1933, c. 86, § 5, p. 345;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-705;

Laws 1943, c. 146, § 2(1), p. 519;

R.S.1943, § 70-621;

Laws 1944, Spec. Sess., c. 5, § 1(4), p. 106;

Laws 1981, LB 181, § 15.